Hawaii statutes.
§286-210 Operation of a motor carrier
vehicle without a safety inspection decal. Whoever operates, permits the
operation of, causes to be operated, or parks any motor carrier vehicle on a
public highway without a current motor carrier vehicle safety inspection decal,
issued under section 286-209, shall be fined $100 for each day of the
violation. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 214, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next